Washington statutes.
RCW 39.92.900

Severability—Prospective application—1988 c 179.

If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected. This act is intended to be prospective, not retroactive, in its application.

[ 1988 c 179 s 17.]